Utah statutes.
63M-1-1108.   Duration of designation.

A recycling market development zone designation ends five years from the date the office designates the area as a recycling market development zone, at the end of which the county or municipality may reapply for the designation.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

